Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2752.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 27 O.S. 2021, Section 7, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 7. A. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
any person, firm or corporation organized under the laws of this
state, or authorized to do business in this state, to furnish light,
heat or power by electricity or natural gas, or any other person,
association or firm engaged in furnishing lights, heat or power by
electricity or natural gas shall have and exercise the right of
eminent domain in the same manner and by like proceedings as
provided for railroad corporations by laws of this state.

B. The power of eminent domain shall not be used for the siting
or building of wind turbines energy facilities, solar energy
facilities, battery storage facilities, hydrogen gas facilities, or
other renewable energy facilities on private property.
C. Prior to seeking to exercise eminent domain for an electric
transmission facility rated greater than three hundred (300)
kilovolts, any person, firm, or corporation under the purview of
subsection A of this section must have obtained a Certificate of
Authority from the Corporation Commission.
D. This section shall not be construed to require any Oklahoma
retail electric supplier or rural electric cooperative to secure a
Certificate of Authority for any extension, rebuild, or upgrade to
an electric transmission facility.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2752 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2752 Page 3